California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) The renewal fee in effect at the time of renewal.

(b) A penalty fee equal to 50 percent of the renewal fee.

(c) The delinquency fee required by Section 2435 or 2499.5, as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 21.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2425.

(a) The board may prepare and provide electronically or by mail to every licensed physician at the time of license renewal a questionnaire containing any questions as are necessary to establish that the physician currently has no disorder that would impair the physician’s ability to practice medicine safely.

(b) Each licensed physician shall complete, sign, and return the questionnaire either
 electronically or by mail to the board as a condition of renewing their license.

(c) The questionnaire described in this section shall not require disclosure of any information prohibited under Section 2090.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 952, Sec. 2.   (AB 2164)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2425.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Currently, California is experiencing an access to health care crisis that, in large measure, is the result of medical group insolvency, health facility closures, low or no reimbursement rates, and an increasing number of uninsured.

(b) Adding to the access to health care crisis is a state population that is growing in cultural and linguistic diversity as well as in absolute numbers.

(c) On paper, California appears to have an adequate number of physicians in most areas of the state. California, however, does not have data indicating the cultural and linguistic background of licensed physicians, how many physicians are actively practicing medicine, how many physicians are practicing part time, how many physicians have retired from practice, or how many physicians have moved into administrative positions and no longer treat patients.

(d) In order to fully understand and cope with California’s access to health care crisis, it is necessary to collect data concerning the status and scope of practice of California’s licensed physicians as well as his or her cultural and linguistic background.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 509, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

2425.3.

(a) A licensed physician and surgeon shall report to the board, immediately upon issuance of an initial license and at the time of license renewal, any specialty board certification he or she holds that is issued by a member board of the American Board of Medical Specialties or approved by the Medical Board of California.

(b) A licensed physician and surgeon shall also report to the board, immediately upon issuance of an initial license and at the time of license renewal, his or her practice status, designated as one of the following:

(1) Full-time practice in California.

(2) Full-time practice
 outside of California.

(3) Part-time practice in California.

(4) Medical administrative employment that does not include direct patient care.

(5) Retired.

(6) Other practice status, as may be further defined by the board.

(c) (1) A licensed physician and surgeon shall report to the board, immediately upon issuance of an initial license and at the time of license renewal, and the board shall collect, information regarding his or her cultural background and foreign language proficiency. The board shall provide an option for a licensed physician and surgeon to decline to state in the report his or her cultural background and foreign language proficiency.

(2) Information collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be aggregated on an annual basis based on categories utilized by the board in the collection of the data, and shall be aggregated into both statewide totals and ZIP code of primary practice location totals.

(3) Aggregated information under this subdivision shall be compiled annually and reported on the board’s Internet Web site on or before October 1 of each year.

(d) The information collected pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) may also be placed on the board’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 505, Sec. 7.   (AB 1070)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2426.

(a) A licensee shall report to the board at the time of renewal of a license any financial interest that the licensee or a member of the licensee’s immediate family may have in a health-related facility. The report shall be made on a form provided by the board.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) A “financial interest” includes, but is not limited to, any type of ownership interest, debt, loan, lease, compensation, remuneration, discount, rebate, refund, dividend, distribution, subsidy, or other form of direct or indirect payment, whether in money or otherwise, to a licensee or the licensee’s immediate family from a health-related facility.

(2) A “financial interest” also exists if there is an indirect relationship between a licensee and the health-related facility including, but not limited to, an arrangement whereby a licensee has an ownership interest in an entity that leases property to the health-related facility. Any financial interest transferred by a licensee to, or otherwise established in, any person or entity for the purpose of avoiding the reporting required by this section shall be deemed a financial interest of the licensee.

(3) A “financial interest” does not include a licensee’s ownership of corporate investment securities, including shares, bonds, or other debt instruments that are purchased from a licensed securities broker on terms that are available to the general public through a licensed securities exchange or NASDAQ, do not base profit distributions or other transfers of value on the licensee’s referral of persons to the corporation, do not have a separate class or accounting for any persons or for any licensees who may refer persons to the corporation, and are in a corporation that had, at the end of the corporation’s most recent fiscal year, total gross assets exceeding one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000).

(4) “Immediate family” includes a spouse, child, or parent of a licensee, and a spouse of a child of a licensee.

(5) “Licensee” means a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to this chapter.

(6) A “health-related facility” shall include a facility for clinical laboratory services, radiation oncology, physical therapy, physical rehabilitation, psychometric testing, home infusion therapy, diagnostic imaging, and outpatient surgery centers. “Diagnostic imaging” shall include, but is not limited to, all X-ray, computed axial tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, nuclear medicine, positron emission tomography, mammography, and ultrasound goods and services.

(c) The information reported to the board shall be available to government agencies and public or private payers.

(d) The board may impose appropriate sanctions, including the issuance of a citation and civil penalty under Section 125.9, against any licensee who fails to comply with this section.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 1994.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2097 by Stats. 1995, Ch. 279, Sec. 2.7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2427.

(a) Except as provided in Section 2429, a license which has expired may be renewed at any time within five years after its expiration on filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the licensing authority and payment of all accrued renewal fees and any other fees required by Section 2424. If the license is not renewed within 30 days after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the prescribed delinquency fee, if any. Except as provided in Section 2424, renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the renewal application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee or accrued renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee or the delinquency fee and penalty fee, if any, are paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date set forth in Section 2422 or 2423 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire and become invalid if it is not again renewed.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the license of a doctor of podiatric medicine which has expired may be renewed at any time within three years after its expiration on filing an application for renewal on a form prescribed by the licensing authority and payment of all accrued renewal fees and any other fees required by Section 2424. If the license is not renewed within 30 days after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to renewal, shall also pay the prescribed delinquency fee, if any. Except as provided in Section 2424, renewal under this section shall be effective on the date on which the renewal application is filed, on the date on which the renewal fee or accrued renewal fees are paid, or on the date on which the delinquency fee or the delinquency fee and penalty fee, if any, are paid, whichever last occurs. If so renewed, the license shall continue in effect through the expiration date set forth in Section 2422 or 2423 which next occurs after the effective date of the renewal, when it shall expire and become invalid if it is not again renewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 26.5.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2428.

(a) A person who voluntarily cancels his or her license or who fails to renew his or her license within five years after its expiration shall not renew it, but that person may apply for and obtain a new license if he or she:

(1) Has not committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475).

(2) Takes and passes the examination, if any, which would be required of him or her if application for licensure was being made for the first time, or otherwise establishes to the satisfaction of the licensing authority that passes on the qualifications of applicants for the license that, with due regard for the public interest, he or she is
 qualified to practice the profession or activity for which the applicant was originally licensed.

(3) Pays all of the fees that would be required if application for licensure was being made for the first time.

The licensing authority may provide for the waiver or refund of all or any part of an examination fee in those cases in which a license is issued without an examination pursuant to this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the issuance of a license for a professional activity or system or mode of healing for which licenses are no longer required.

(b) In addition to the requirements set forth in subdivision (a), an applicant shall establish that he or she meets one of the following requirements: (1) satisfactory completion of at least three years of approved
 postgraduate training; (2) certification by a specialty board approved by the American Board of Medical Specialties or approved by the board pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 651; or (3) passing of the clinical competency written examination.

(c) Subdivision (a) shall apply to persons who held licenses to practice podiatric medicine except that those persons who failed to renew their licenses within three years after its expiration may not renew it, and it may not be reissued, reinstated, or restored, except in accordance with subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 571, Sec. 7.   (SB 1480)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2429.

(a) A license which is suspended for unprofessional conduct is subject to expiration and shall be renewed as provided in this article, but such renewal does not entitle the licensee, while the license remains suspended, and until it is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity, or in any other activity or conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

(b) A license which is revoked for unprofessional conduct is subject to expiration as provided in this article, but it shall not be renewed. If it is reinstated by the licensing authority after its expiration, the licensee, as a condition precedent to reinstatement or restoration of licensure, shall pay a reinstatement fee which is an amount equal to the current renewal fee, plus the delinquency fee, if any.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2432.

Upon filing an application therefor, containing such information as the licensing authority may require and accompanied by the required duplicate certificate fee, if any, a duplicate certificate may be issued to any person so licensed under the applicable provisions of law where the same certificate applied for has been previously issued or, where there has been a change in name, another certificate in lieu of one previously issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2433.

Upon filing an application therefor, containing such information as the licensing authority may require and accompanied by the required endorsement fee, if any, the licensure or credentials of the person so licensed may be endorsed or certified.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. Revenue [2435. - 2448.]

2435.

The following fees apply to the licensure of physicians and surgeons:

(a) Each applicant for a certificate based upon a national board diplomate certificate, each applicant for a certificate based on reciprocity, and each applicant for a certificate based upon written examination, shall pay a nonrefundable application and processing fee, as set forth in subdivision (b), at the time the application is filed.

(b) The application and processing fee shall be six hundred twenty-five dollars ($625).

(c) (1) Each applicant who qualifies for a certificate, as a condition precedent to its issuance, in addition to other fees required herein, shall
 pay an initial license fee. The initial license fee shall be one thousand one hundred fifty-one dollars ($1,151). An applicant enrolled in an approved postgraduate training program shall be required to pay only 50 percent of the initial license fee.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, the initial license fee shall be one thousand two hundred fifty-five dollars ($1,255).

(d) (1) For licenses that expire on or after January 1, 2024, the biennial renewal fee shall be one thousand one hundred fifty-one dollars ($1,151).

(2) For licenses that expire on or after January 1, 2027, the biennial renewal fee shall be one thousand two hundred fifty-five dollars ($1,255).

(e) Notwithstanding Section 163.5, the delinquency fee shall be 10 percent of
 the biennial renewal fee.

(f) The duplicate certificate and endorsement fees shall each be fifty dollars ($50), and the certification and letter of good standing fees shall each be ten dollars ($10).

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, if at the end of any fiscal year the board has unencumbered funds in an amount that is equal to or more than the board’s operating budget for the next six months, the board shall reduce license or other fees, whether the license or other fees be fixed by statute or may be determined by the board within limits fixed by statute, during the following fiscal year in an amount that will reduce any surplus funds of the board to an amount less than the board’s operating budget for the next six months.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 24.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2435.1.

(a) In addition to the fees charged for the initial issuance or biennial renewal of a physician and surgeon’s certificate pursuant to Section 2435, and at the time those fees are charged, the board shall charge each applicant or renewing licensee an additional twenty-five dollar ($25) fee for the purposes of this section.

(b) Payment of this twenty-five dollar ($25) fee shall be voluntary, paid at the time of application for initial licensure or biennial renewal, and due and payable along with the fee for the initial certificate or biennial renewal.

(c) The board shall transfer all funds
 collected pursuant to this section, on a monthly basis, to the Department of Health Care Access and Information to augment the local assistance line item of the annual Budget Act in support of the Song-Brown Family Physician Training Act (Article 1 (commencing with Section 128200) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 12.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2435.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if Article 14 (commencing with Section 2340) becomes inoperative or the diversion program described in that article is discontinued, the board shall reduce the amount of the following fees:

(1) The initial license fee, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 2435.

(2) The biennial renewal fee, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 2435.

(b) The amount of the reductions made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall equal the board’s cost of operating the diversion program.

(c) The board shall not make the reductions described in subdivision (a) if a diversion program is established by statute and requires the board to fund it in whole or in part from licensure fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 82.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2435.3.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if Section 12529.6 of the Government Code remains operative on or after July 1, 2008, and is not repealed, the board may, by regulation, beginning January 1, 2009, increase the amount of the initial licensure fee and the biennial licensure renewal fee by a maximum of twenty dollars ($20) each, if an increase is required for the cost of transferring those employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 674, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

2436.

The fees in this article fixed by the board shall be set forth as emergency regulations duly adopted by the Division of Licensing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1267, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2436.5.

(a) (1) In addition to the fees charged for the initial issuance or biennial renewal of a physician and surgeon’s certificate pursuant to Section 2435, and at the time those fees are charged, the board shall charge each applicant or renewing licensee an additional twenty-five-dollar ($25) fee for the purposes of this section.

(2) The twenty-five-dollar ($25) fee shall be paid at the time of application for initial licensure or biennial renewal and shall be due and payable along with the fee for the initial certificate or biennial renewal.

(3) 
 On or before July 1, 2015, the board shall develop a mechanism for a physician and surgeon to pay a voluntary contribution, at the time of application for initial licensure or biennial renewal, for the purposes of this section.

(b) The board shall transfer all funds collected pursuant to this section, on a monthly basis, to the Medically Underserved Account for Physicians created by Section 128555 of the Health and Safety Code for the Steven M. Thompson Physician Corps Loan Repayment Program. Notwithstanding Section 128555 of the Health and Safety Code, these funds shall not be used to
 provide funding for the Physician Volunteer Program.

(c) Up to 15 percent of the funds collected pursuant to this section shall be dedicated to loan assistance for physicians and surgeons who agree to practice in geriatric care settings or settings that primarily serve adults over 65 years of age or adults with disabilities. Priority consideration shall be given to those physicians and surgeons who are trained in, and practice, geriatrics and who can meet the cultural and linguistic needs and demands of diverse populations of older Californians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (SB 1116)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

2437.

The board may fix a fee for the approval of postgraduate training for clinical service programs approved by the Division of Licensing at an amount equal to the cost to the division in reviewing applications for approval of those programs, but in no event shall the fee exceed four hundred dollars ($400).

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1176, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

2439.

(a) Every licensee is exempt from the payment of the renewal fee and requirement for continuing medical education if the licensee has applied to the Division of Licensing for a retired license. The holder of a retired license may not engage in the practice of medicine or the practice of podiatric medicine.

(b) If a physician and surgeon has applied to convert from retired status to active status on or after January 1, 2004, but prior to January 1, 2005, the fee to change license status shall be waived, unless the change in status coincides with the physician and surgeon’s license renewal date. The board shall refund any fees paid by a physician and surgeon to change from retired to active status after January 1, 2004, and before January 1, 2005, unless the change in status coincides with the physician and surgeon’s license renewal date.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 909, Ch. 607, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2004, Ch. 909, Sec. 3.5.   Effective September 30, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

2440.

(a) Every licensee is exempt from the payment of the renewal fee while engaged in full-time training or active service in the Army, Navy, Air Force, or Marines, or in the United States Public Health Service.

(b) Every person exempted from the payment of the renewal fee by this section shall not engage in any private practice and shall become liable for payment of such fee for the current renewal period upon his or her discharge from full-time active service and shall have a period of 60 days after becoming liable within which to pay the renewal fee before the delinquency fee is required. Any person who is discharged from active service within 60 days of the end of a renewal period is exempt from the payment of the renewal fee for that period.

(c) The time spent in full-time active service or training shall not be included in the computation of the five-year period for renewal and reinstatement of licensure provided in Sections 2427 and 2428.

(d) Nothing in this section shall exempt a person, exempt from renewal fees under this section, from meeting the requirements of Article 10 (commencing with Section 2190).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 220, Sec. 11.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

2441.

(a) Any licensee who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that he or she is unable to practice medicine due to a disability may request a waiver of the license renewal fee. The granting of a waiver shall be at the discretion of the board and may be terminated at any time. Waivers shall be based on the inability of a licensee to practice medicine. A licensee whose renewal fee has been waived pursuant to this section shall not engage in the practice of medicine unless and until the licensee pays the current renewal fee and does either of the following:

(1) Establishes to the satisfaction of the board, on a form prescribed by the board and signed under penalty of perjury, that
 the licensee’s disability either no longer exists or does not affect his or her ability to practice medicine safely.

(2) Signs an agreement on a form prescribed by the board, signed under penalty of perjury, in which the licensee agrees to limit his or her practice in the manner prescribed by the reviewing physician and agreed to by the board.

(b) The board may require the licensee described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) to obtain an independent clinical evaluation of his or her ability to practice medicine safely as a condition of receiving a disabled status license under this section.

(c) Any person who knowingly provides false information in the agreement submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be subject to any sanctions available to the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 303, Sec. 4.   (AB 2745)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2442.

The renewal fee shall be waived for a physician and surgeon who certifies to the Medical Board of California that license renewal is for the sole purpose of providing voluntary, unpaid service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 239, Sec. 2.   (SB 1261)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2443.

The following fees apply to fictitious-name permits issued under Section 2415:

(a) The initial permit fee shall be seventy dollars ($70). If the permit will expire less than one year after its issuance, then the initial permit fee is an amount equal to 50 percent of the fee in effect at the beginning of the current renewal cycle.

(b) For permits that expire on or after January 1, 2022, the biennial renewal fee shall be fifty dollars ($50).

(c) The delinquency fee is twenty dollars ($20).

(d) The duplicate permit fee shall be forty dollars
 ($40).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 23.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2445.

All moneys paid to and received by the board shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall be credited to the Contingent Fund of the Medical Board of California. Those moneys shall be reported at the beginning of each month, for the month preceding, to the Controller.

Moneys in the contingent fund shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the use of the board and from it shall be paid all salaries and all other expenses necessarily incurred in carrying into effect the provisions of this chapter.

If there is any surplus in these receipts after the board’s salaries and expenses are paid, such surplus shall be applied solely to expenses
 incured under the provisions of this chapter. No surplus in these receipts shall be deposited in or transferred to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 775, Sec. 83.   (SB 798)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2446.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, all fines imposed or forfeitures of bail collected by any court in connection with any violation of the provisions of this chapter shall, as soon as practicable after receipt thereof, be deposited with the county treasurer of the county in which such court is situated.

Amounts so deposited shall be paid at least once a month as follows:

(a) Seventy-five percent to the State Treasurer by warrant of the county auditor drawn upon the requisition of the clerk or judge of the court for deposit as provided in Section 2445.

(b) Twenty-five percent to the county where the case is pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2447.

The board shall refund any fees, fines, or forfeitures in accordance with the provisions of Section 158. The board may expend from its contingent fund whatever sums may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

The State Treasurer and all other officials having custody of the funds of the board shall upon request or direction of the board pay out the refunds or approve such payments from the contingent fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2448.

Notwithstanding the possession by a licensee of a renewal receipt or other acknowledgement of renewal of licensure, a license issued and renewed may, at any time, be suspended, revoked, or forfeited as provided in this chapter without refund of any fees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1313, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 21. Provisions Applicable to Osteopathic Physicians and Surgeons [2450. - 2459.7.]

2450.

There is a Board of Osteopathic Examiners of the State of California, established by the Osteopathic Act, which shall be known as the Osteopathic Medical Board of California which enforces this chapter relating to persons holding or applying for physician’s and surgeon’s certificates issued by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California under the Osteopathic Act.

Persons who elect to practice using the term of suffix “M.D.,” as provided in Section 2275, shall not be subject to this article, and the Medical Board of California shall enforce the provisions of this chapter relating to persons who made the election.

Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, as set forth in this article and under the Osteopathic
 Act, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this article were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 294, Sec. 25.   (SB 815)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2450.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Osteopathic Medical Board of California in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 107, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2451.

The words “Medical Board of California,” the term “board,” or any reference to a division of the Medical Board of California as used in this chapter shall be deemed to mean the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, where that board exercises the functions granted to it by the Osteopathic Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

2452.

This chapter applies to the Osteopathic Medical Board of California so far as consistent with the Osteopathic Act. Unless otherwise provided, this article is administered by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

2453.

(a) It is the policy of this state that holders of M.D. degrees and D.O. degrees shall be accorded equal professional status and privileges as licensed physicians and surgeons.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no health facility subject to licensure under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1250) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, no health care service plan, nonprofit hospital service plan, policy of disability insurance, self-insured employer welfare benefit plan, and no agency of the state or of any city, county, city and county, district, or other political subdivision of the state shall discriminate with respect to employment, staff privileges, or the provision of, or contracts for, professional services against a licensed physician and surgeon on the basis of whether the physician and surgeon holds an M.D. or D.O. degree. This section shall not be construed to require a disability insurer health care service plan or hospital service plan to employ, offer staff privileges, or contract for professional services with a class of physician who holds an M.D. or D.O. degree. However, this subdivision shall not prohibit a school of allopathic medicine or a school of osteopathic medicine from employing a physician and surgeon as an instructor on the basis of whether the physician and surgeon holds an M.D. or D.O. degree, where the subject matter to be taught specifically requires allopathic or osteopathic training and experience.

(c) Whenever the health facility staffing requirements for staff or department privileges mandate that the physician who has been granted privileges be certified or eligible for certification by an appropriate American medical board, that position must be made available on an equal basis to an osteopathic physician who is certified or eligible for certification by the appropriate American osteopathic board.

(d) Whenever an entity that contracts with physicians and surgeons or osteopathic physicians to provide managed care or risk-based care requires that the physician who is responsible for the contract be certified or eligible for certification by an appropriate American medical board, the contract reference to American medical board shall be construed to mean American Osteopathic Board when the contracting physician is an osteopathic physician.

(e) Staff self-government, involving M.D. and D.O. physicians and surgeons, with respect to the professional work performed in the health facility, shall be accomplished by holding periodic meetings of the staff to review and analyze at regular intervals their clinical experience. Patient medical records shall be the basis for such review and analysis.

(f) The physician and surgeon staff shall be required to establish controls that are designed to ensure the achievement and maintenance of high standards of professional and ethical practices including a provision that all members of the physician and surgeon staff be required to demonstrate their ability to perform surgical and other procedures competently and to the satisfaction of an appropriate committee or committees of the staff at the time of original application for appointment to the staff and at least every two years thereafter.

(g) No health facility may adopt written bylaws in accordance with legal requirements that in any way are construed to circumvent the intent of the Legislature or any other nondiscriminatory provisions contained in either the Medical Practice Act or in any provisions applicable to osteopathic physicians.

(h) No entity that contracts with physicians and surgeons to provide managed care or risk-based care may adopt written bylaws in accordance with legal requirements that in any way are construed to circumvent the intent of the Legislature or any other nondiscriminatory provisions contained in either the Medical Practice Act or in any provisions applicable to osteopathic physicians.

(i) For the purposes of this section, no professional medical or osteopathic association may mandate membership in their respective organizations as a prerequisite for a physician to obtain staff privileges, employment, or in the offering of a contract for services.

(j) Any violation of subdivisions (b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), and (i) may be enjoined in an action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurs, upon receipt of a complaint by an aggrieved physician and surgeon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 619, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2453.5.

Individuals possessing physician’s and surgeon’s certificates issued by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall not hold themselves out to be board certified unless the board certification has been granted by the appropriate certifying board, as authorized by the American Osteopathic Association or the American Board of Medical Specialties, or is the result of a postgraduate training program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2454.5.

In order to ensure the continuing competence of licensed osteopathic physicians and surgeons, the board shall adopt and administer standards for the continuing education of those licensees. The board shall require each licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon to demonstrate satisfaction of the continuing education requirements as a condition for the renewal of a license at intervals of not less than one year nor more than two years. The board shall require each licensed osteopathic physician and surgeon to complete a minimum of 50 hours of American Osteopathic Association continuing education hours during each two-year cycle, of which 20 hours shall be completed in American Osteopathic Association Category 1 continuing education hours and the remaining 30 hours shall be either American Osteopathic Association or American Medical Association
 accredited as a condition for renewal of an active license. Licensed osteopathic physicians and surgeons shall complete a course on the risks of addiction associated with the use of Schedule II drugs.

For purposes of this section, “American Osteopathic Association Category 1” means continuing education activities and programs approved for Category 1 credit by the Committee on Continuing Medical Education of the American Osteopathic Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 649, Sec. 25.   (SB 806)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2454.6.

In determining its continuing education requirements, the board shall consider including a course in infection-associated chronic conditions, including, but not limited to, long COVID, as defined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, myalgic encephalomyelitis, and dysautonomia.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 433, Sec. 2.   (AB 3119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

2454.7.

(a) Beginning July 1, 2027, a qualifying osteopathic physician and surgeon who completes continuing medical education courses in perimenopause, menopause, and postmenopausal care shall receive two hours of credit for each hour completed of that coursework, for a total earned credit that does not exceed eight course hours, toward the requirement set forth in Section 1635 of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualifying osteopathic physician and surgeon” means a holder of a physician’s and surgeon’s certificate who is certified by a member board of the American Board of Medical Specialties or the American Osteopathic Association in internal medicine, family medicine, obstetrics and gynecology,
 neurology, neurological surgery, or psychiatry and whose patient population is composed of adult women under 65 years of age.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 3.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2455.

The amount of fees and refunds is that established by the following schedule for any certificate issued by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California. All other fees and refunds for any certificate issued by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California which are not prescribed in this schedule, are prescribed in Sections 2455.1 and 2456. Any and all fees received by the Osteopathic Medical Board of California shall be for the sole purpose of the operation of the board and shall not be used for any other purpose, except as specified in Section 2455.1.
